Utah statutes.
32B-4-418.   Unlawful storage.

It is unlawful for a person to store liquor on premises for which the person is authorized to sell beer for on-premise consumption, but for which the person is not licensed under this title to sell liquor.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

